Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 5-9-134.
Probation;
correction and reduction of sentence.

The circuit court may
place a criminal defendant on probation pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

through

7-13-307

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the probation
period for a defendant whose disposition includes participation in
a substance abuse treatment program or a court supervised treatment
program may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for
the offense, but shall not exceed three (3) years. The court shall
conduct, on at least a monthly basis, a review on the progress of
a defendant sentenced to treatment under this section. The review
may be conducted in a manner the court deems appropriate, but shall
include receiving regular progress reports from the treatment provider.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.38; Laws 1989, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-136

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2003, ch. 140, § 1; 2009, ch. 145, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the second sentence, substituted “court supervised treatment program” for “drug court” and substituted “three (3) years” for “two (2) years.”

§ 5-9-135.
Filing fee.

For all civil matters the circuit court shall collect from the plaintiff an original filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), a court automation fee of forty dollars ($40.00), and an indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00) excluding small claims civil actions as provided in W.S.

1-21-201

through

1-21-205

which shall have a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The court automation fee shall be deposited into the judicial systems automation account and the indigent civil legal services fee shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account as provided by W.S.

5-9-144

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.39; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-137

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; ch. 25, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

5-9-144

” for “W.S.

5-5-152

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “and an indigent civil legal services fee of ten dollars ($10.00)”; inserted “and the indigent civil legal services fee shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account”; and made a related change.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “a court automation fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “a court automation fee of ten dollars ($10.00)” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 5-9-136.
Request for jury in civil actions; fee; right to jury in criminal
actions.

In civil actions in a
circuit court, a jury shall be considered waived unless demand is
made by either party as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure
and a jury fee in the amount provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil
Procedure is paid to the clerk of the circuit court and thereafter
is deposited and dispersed as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil
Procedure. In criminal proceedings in a circuit court the accused
shall have the right to a trial by jury unless such right is waived
as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.41; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-139

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to waiver of right to jury trial in criminal proceeding, see Rule 23, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jury trial rights in, and on appeal from, small claims court proceeding, 70 ALR4th 1119.

§ 5-9-137.
Jury lists.

Jurors shall be selected
from the jury lists selected for the district courts of the state
pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

1-11-101

through

1-11-204

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.42; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-140

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-138.
Abstract of judgment; lien of judgment on real estate; lien on real
estate in another county.

At any time while the papers in any case in which a judgment has been rendered by a circuit court are retained by the court, the judge shall certify and deliver an abstract of the judgment to any person on the payment of a five dollar ($5.00) fee.

The judgment creditor in any judgment rendered in circuit court may file with the clerk of the district court and record with the county clerk of the county in which the judgment was rendered a transcript thereof, certifying therein the amount paid thereon, if any. The clerk of the district court shall enter the case on the execution docket, together with the amount of the judgment. If within ten (10) days after the judgment was rendered, the judgment debtor pays the same or gives bond for stay of execution, the circuit judge shall immediately certify that fact to the clerk of the district court and the county clerk. The clerk of the district court shall enter a memorandum thereof upon the execution docket. The cost of the transcript, the filing, recording and the entry on the docket shall be paid by the party who files and records the transcript and may be taxed to the other party. The judgment shall be a lien on the real estate of the judgment debtor within the county from the day and time the transcript is recorded with the county clerk. Execution may be issued on the judgment at any time after filing the transcript with the clerk of the district court as if the judgment had been rendered in the district court.

The judgment creditor in any judgment rendered by any circuit court in this state and filed in the judgment record of the district court, may file a transcript of the judgment record of the district court with the clerk of the district court and record a transcript of the judgment with the county clerk in any other county within this state where the judgment debtor owns real estate. The judgment is a lien upon all real estate of the judgment debtor in any county in which the transcript is recorded with the county clerk from the date of recording with the county clerk. The clerk of the district court of any county in which the transcript is filed shall enter the judgment upon the judgment records of the court in the same manner as judgments are rendered in that court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.43; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-141

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2001, ch. 69, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Judgment lien or levy of execution on one joint tenant's share or interest as severing joint tenancy, 51 ALR4th 906.

§ 5-9-139.
Reporting
of proceedings; preservation thereof.

In any judicial proceedings before the circuit court, unless waived by the parties whenever the presiding judge of a circuit court shall deem it necessary, or upon the request of either party, the court shall provide for the reporting of the testimony and proceedings, with objections made, the rulings of the court, and oral and written charges. The reporting may be made by stenographic reporting, electronic recording or other appropriate means authorized by the court.

The testimony and proceedings shall be retained and preserved for at least twelve (12) months after entry of final judgment, sentence, or order on appeal if an appeal is taken.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.46; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-144

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2004, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b) substituted “twelve (12)” for “twenty-four (24).”

Extension of filing period following expiration not permitted.
—

There can be no extension of a period which has already elapsed or terminated, and a valid order extending the time in which to file can only be made prior to the time allowed by a previous order of the court. Elliott v. State, 626 P.2d 1044,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 326

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 5-9-140.
Appointment
of special reporters; certification of transcript.

If the record is to be
made by a stenographic reporter, the judge shall appoint a special
stenographic reporter to report the testimony and proceedings. If
the record is made by means of electronic recording, the judge shall
appoint a special reporter to make the electronic recording, and in
those cases in which it is required, the judge shall appoint an official
stenographer to furnish with reasonable diligence a typewritten transcript
of the testimony and proceedings. The report of the official stenographer,
when typewritten and certified by him as a correct transcript of the
testimony and proceedings in the case, shall be prima facie a correct
statement of such testimony and proceedings. The signature of the
stenographer on the certification of the transcript shall be duly
acknowledged by him before a notarial officer of this state.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.47; Laws 1979, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-145

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public or judicial officer” near the end.

§ 5-9-141.
Civil and criminal cases reviewed on record.

In civil and criminal
cases a judge of a district court shall review the case on the record
on appeal.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 46; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.48; Laws 1978, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-146

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Appeal by state of order granting new trial in criminal case, 95 ALR3d 596.

§ 5-9-142.
Stay of execution on judgment; bond.

In a civil matter no
execution on a judgment may be stayed unless and until the party applying
for the appeal, or someone for him, gives bond in an amount and with
sufficient surety approved by the judge of the district court or the
clerk of the district court, to abide by such judgment as may be rendered
on appeal if such appeal is perfected, or if not so perfected, then
to satisfy the judgment of the circuit court. If such bond is furnished
by or on behalf of any party against whom the judgment has been rendered
for money or property or both, the bond shall be conditioned for the
performance and satisfaction of such judgment or order as may be entered
against such party on appeal, and for the payment of all costs and
damages which may be awarded against him in the district court. If
the appeal is by a party against whom there is no recovery except
for costs, the bond shall be conditioned for the payment of such costs
and damages as may be awarded against him on the appeal.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 47; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.49; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-147

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-143.
Security on appeal.

The district court to
which an appeal is taken from a circuit court in a civil case may
on motion for good cause shown, after five (5) days notice to the
appellant, require the appellant to give new or additional security.
If the security is not given within the time prescribed by the district
court, the appeal shall be dismissed with costs, and the judgment
of the circuit court shall remain in effect, and the district court
shall enter judgment and award execution thereon, with costs, against
the appellant and his surety.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 48; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.50; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-148

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-144.
Receipts for money paid into court.

When any money is paid into a circuit court, a receipt for said amount shall be issued promptly upon a form prescribed by the Wyoming supreme court. The receipts shall be prenumbered in numerical sequence. The original copy shall be delivered to a payor making payment by cash or in person, otherwise the original shall be attached to the court file. A copy shall be filed in the office of the issuing judge. The receipts shall be prenumbered by the printer, and the printer shall give to the supreme court a receipt showing the numbers so printed. Except as provided in W.S.

5-9-106

, the circuit court shall pay all fines, forfeitures and other penalties to the county treasurer and all fees, costs and other receipts to the state treasurer. The court automation fee prescribed by W.S.

5-9-135

or established by court rule shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

. The indigent civil legal services fee prescribed by W.S.

5-9-135

shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

. The police officer continuing education and training fee prescribed by W.S. 31-5-1201(h) shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the account in the enterprise fund under W.S. 9-1-633(n).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 52; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.54; Laws 1981, ch. 141, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1998, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-152

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; ch. 25, § 2; 2005, ch. 33, § 1; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2018 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit” or a variant.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added the present last sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the last sentence.

§ 5-9-145.
Failure of judge to give receipt constitutes cause for removal from
office.

Failure, refusal, or
neglect of a judge of a circuit court to give a receipt as required
by W.S.

5-9-144

, for any money paid into the circuit court is misconduct,
which constitutes cause for removal from office.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 53; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.55; 1998, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-153

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-9-146.
Deposit of money with county or state treasurer.

When any fines, forfeitures,
costs or fees are deposited with the judge of a circuit court pursuant
to any action or proceedings in the court, or pursuant to any order,
decree or judgment of the court, the money in his possession shall
be deposited no later than the tenth day following the month of receipt
with the county or state treasurer, except as provided in W.S.

5-9-106

. If the money has not been so deposited by the tenth
day of the month and no just cause is shown, said judge shall forfeit
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) a day for each day after the tenth day
of the month during which the deposits have not been made.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 54; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.56; Laws 1981, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-154

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; ch. 25, § 2.

§ 5-9-147.
Supreme
court to establish uniform accounting system.

The Wyoming supreme court
shall establish, supervise, and as necessary from time to time, modify
a uniform system of accounting, including a system of regular audits
for circuit courts, to provide for the proper and uniform accounting
of all money received and disbursed by circuit courts, and all judges
of the circuit courts shall comply therewith.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 55; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.57; Laws 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-155

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit.”

§ 5-9-148.
Failure
to keep accounts or account for money.

Failure to keep accounts
pursuant to the system established by the Wyoming supreme court or
failure to account for money paid into and disbursed by the circuit
court is misconduct, which may constitute cause for removal from office.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 56; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.58; Laws 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-156

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit.”

§ 5-9-149.
Bank accounts.

The accounting system established by the Wyoming supreme court may provide for bank accounts for each circuit court in which money received by the circuit court may be deposited and disbursed as provided therein, and for such records, reports and procedures as the supreme court requires. If a bank account is established into which fines, costs or forfeitures are deposited, the accounting system established by the supreme court shall require, where available, the use of accounts in a financial institution authorized by W.S. 9-4-803(a) which may earn interest, in which the deposits are subject to payment upon demand and which are insured or secured as provided in W.S. 9-4-817(c). Interest earned on deposits of fines and forfeitures in such accounts shall be forwarded monthly to the county treasurer and credited to the county public school fund. Interest earned on all other deposits in such accounts shall be forwarded to the state treasurer quarterly and credited to the victim’s compensation account created by W.S. 1-40-114(a).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 57; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.59; Laws 1986, ch. 110, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-157

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2004, ch. 62, § 1; 2005, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 98, § 1, effective March 2, 2017; 2019 ch. 107, § 1, effective February 26, 2019.

The 2004 amendment

inserted “may” following “9-4-817(a) which.”

Laws 2004, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit” or a variant throughout.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “created by W.S. 1-40-114(a)” for “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2017 amendment

, substituted “authorized
by W.S. 9-4-803(a)” for “listed in W.S. 9-4-817(a)” in the third sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

deleted the second sentence which read: "Money received as fines, forfeitures or court costs may not be deposited in the same bank account as money received in civil matters."

Laws 2019, ch. 107 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 5-9-150.
Examination
of accounts.

The accounts of each
circuit court shall be examined by the Wyoming supreme court in accordance
with rules adopted by the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 58; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.60; Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-158

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly provided that accounts would be examined in accordance with W.S.

16-4-122

and

16-4-123

.

§ 5-9-151.
Annual accounts
submitted to state auditor and supreme court.

Each circuit court shall
submit annual accounts to the state auditor and supreme court under
rules prescribed by the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 59; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.61; Laws 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-159

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly required that each circuit court submit annual accounts to the director of the state department of audit under regulations prescribed by the director.

§ 5-9-152.
Suit to
enforce collection or transmittal of fines; failure to transmit constitutes
cause for removal from office; liability on judge's bond.

If it is apparent through examination conducted by the Wyoming supreme court, or by other means, that any fines or forfeitures have not been transmitted, the county attorney shall bring suit to enforce the collection or transmittal, or both. Failure to transmit fines, forfeitures or costs is misconduct which constitutes cause for removal from office.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 57, § 1.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 60; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.62; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-160

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1; 2011, ch. 57, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit or his designee” in (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (b), which read: “The official bond of a judge of a circuit court shall secure, and there shall be a liability thereon, for his failure to transmit such fines, forfeitures, or costs imposed by him.”

§ 5-9-153.
Examination
of court records by public, department of audit, attorney general
and county attorneys permitted.

The records kept by a
judge of a circuit court shall be public and available for examination
during the regular business hours of the court. The state department
of audit, Wyoming supreme court, the attorney general or the county
attorney of the particular county in which the circuit court is situated
may examine them at any time upon demand.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 61; W.S. 1957, § 5-114.63; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

5-5-161

; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3; 2005, ch. 33, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “state department of audit, Wyoming supreme court” for “director of the state department of audit.”

§ 5-9-154.
Electronic
submittal of fees, fines, bonds and penalties.

The supreme court may authorize, develop and implement an electronic transaction system via internet technology or similar medium for submittal of payment to the circuit courts of all fees, penalties and fines and bonds for misdemeanor offenses for which bond may be posted and forfeited. The supreme court shall ensure that any electronic transaction system implemented shall ensure compliance with W.S.

5-9-144

,

5-9-146

,

5-9-149

and any other applicable provisions of law. The supreme court shall further ensure that the adopted electronic transaction system provides for efficient, safe, secure and accurate transactions.

The supreme court may accept payment through the electronic system by credit card, direct withdrawal or any other negotiable instrument under W.S. 9-4-217(h).

Any fees assessed for processing a credit card payment shall be borne by the person tendering payment.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 175, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 175, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.